Missouri, session 2026, HB3413.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 211.021, 211.069, 211.071, 211.072, and 211.073, RSMo, are
repealed and five new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 211.021,
211.071, 211.072, 211.073, and 211.075, to read as follows:
211.021. As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Adult" [means], a person eighteen years of age or older;
(2) "Certified juvenile", a child who has been certified under section 211.071 to
stand trial as an adult for an offense;
(3) "Child" [means], any person under eighteen years of age;
[(3)] (4) "Juvenile court" [means], the juvenile division or divisions of the circuit
court of the county, or judges while hearing juvenile cases assigned to them;
[(4)] (5) "Legal custody" [means], the right to the care, custody and control of a child
and the duty to provide food, clothing, shelter, ordinary medical care, education, treatment
and discipline of a child. Legal custody may be taken from a parent only by court action and
if the legal custody is taken from a parent without termination of parental rights, the parent's
duty to provide support continues even though the person having legal custody may provide
the necessities of daily living;
[(5)] (6) "Parent" [means], either a natural parent or a parent by adoption and if the
child is illegitimate, "parent" means the mother;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3413 2
[(6)] (7) "Shelter care" [means], the temporary care of juveniles in physically
unrestricting facilities pending final court disposition. These facilities may include:
(a) "Foster home", the private home of foster parents providing twenty-four-hour care
to one to three children unrelated to the foster parents by blood, marriage or adoption;
(b) "Group foster home", the private home of foster parents providing twenty-four-
hour care to no more than six children unrelated to the foster parents by blood, marriage or
adoption; or
(c) "Group home", a child care facility which approximates a family setting, provides
access to community activities and resources, and provides care to no more than twelve
children;
(8) "Youth", the same meaning as defined in section 219.011.
211.071. 1. If a petition or motion to modify alleges that a child between the ages of
fourteen and eighteen has committed an offense that would be considered a felony if
committed by an adult, [the court may, upon its] upon the court's own motion or upon
motion by the juvenile officer, the child, or the child's custodian, the court may order a
hearing and may, in its discretion, dismiss the petition or motion to modify and such child
may be transferred to the court of general jurisdiction and prosecuted under the general law;
except that, [if a petition alleges that a child between the ages of twelve and eighteen has
committed an offense that would be considered first degree murder under section 565.020,
second degree murder under section 565.021, first degree assault under section 565.050,
forcible rape under section 566.030 as it existed prior to August 28, 2013, rape in the first
degree under section 566.030, forcible sodomy under section 566.060 as it existed prior to
August 28, 2013, sodomy in the first degree under section 566.060, first degree robbery under
section 569.020 as it existed prior to January 1, 2017, robbery in the first degree under
section 570.023, distribution of drugs under section 195.211 as it existed prior to January 1,
2017, or the manufacturing of a controlled substance under section 579.055, if committed by
an adult, or a dangerous felony as defined in section 556.061, or any felony involving the use,
assistance, or aid of a deadly weapon, or has committed two or more prior unrelated offenses
that would be felonies if committed by an adult,] the court shall order a hearing, and may, in
its discretion, dismiss the petition or motion to modify and transfer the child to a court of
general jurisdiction for prosecution under the general law if the petition or motion to modify
alleges that a child between the ages of twelve and eighteen has committed:
(1) An offense that, if committed by an adult, would be considered:
(a) Murder in the first degree under section 565.020;
(b) Distribution of a controlled substance under section 195.211 as it existed
prior to January 1, 2017;
(c) Manufacture of a controlled substance under section 579.055; or

HB 3413 3
(d) A dangerous felony as defined in section 556.061; or
(2) Two or more prior unrelated offenses that would be felonies if committed by
an adult.
2. Upon apprehension and arrest, jurisdiction over the criminal offense allegedly
committed by any person between eighteen and twenty-one years of age over whom the
juvenile court has retained continuing jurisdiction shall automatically terminate and that
offense shall be dealt with in the court of general jurisdiction as provided in section 211.041.
3. Knowing and willful age misrepresentation by a juvenile subject shall not affect
any action or proceeding which occurs based upon the misrepresentation. Any evidence
obtained during the period of time in which a child misrepresents [his or her] the child's age
may be used against the child and will be subject only to rules of evidence applicable in adult
proceedings.
4. Written notification of a transfer hearing shall be given to the [juvenile] child and
[his or her] the child's custodian in the same manner as provided in sections 211.101 and
211.111. Notice of the hearing may be waived by the custodian. Notice shall contain a
statement that the purpose of the hearing is to determine whether the child is a proper subject
to be dealt with under the provisions of this chapter, and that if the court finds that the child is
not a proper subject to be dealt with under the provisions of this chapter, the petition or
motion to modify will be dismissed to allow for prosecution of the child under the general
law.
5. The juvenile officer [may] shall consult with the office of prosecuting attorney
concerning any offense for which the child could be certified as an adult under this section.
The prosecuting or circuit attorney shall have access to police reports, reports of the juvenile
or deputy juvenile officer, statements of witnesses and all other records or reports relating to
the offense alleged to have been committed by the child. The prosecuting or circuit attorney
shall have access to the disposition records of the child when the child has been adjudicated
pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 211.031. The prosecuting attorney shall
not divulge any information regarding the child and the offense until the juvenile court at a
judicial hearing has determined that the child is not a proper subject to be dealt with under the
provisions of this chapter.
6. A written report shall be prepared in accordance with this chapter developing fully
all available information relevant to the criteria which shall be considered by the court in
determining whether the child is a proper subject to be dealt with under the provisions of this
chapter and whether there are reasonable prospects of rehabilitation within the juvenile justice
system. These criteria shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) The seriousness of the offense alleged and whether the protection of the
community requires transfer to the court of general jurisdiction;

HB 3413 4
(2) Whether the offense alleged involved viciousness, force and violence;
(3) Whether the offense alleged was against persons or property with greater weight
being given to the offense against persons, especially if personal injury resulted;
(4) Whether the offense alleged is a part of a repetitive pattern of offenses [which]
that indicates [that] the child may be beyond rehabilitation under the juvenile code;
(5) The record and history of the child, including experience with the juvenile justice
system, other courts, supervision, commitments to juvenile institutions,and other placements;
(6) The sophistication and maturity of the child as determined by consideration of [his
or her] the child's home and environmental situation, emotional condition, and pattern of
living;
(7) The age of the child;
(8) The program and facilities available to the juvenile court in considering
disposition;
(9) Whether or not the child can benefit from the treatment or rehabilitative programs
available to the juvenile court; and
(10) Racial disparity in certification.
7. If the court dismisses the petition to permit the child to be prosecuted under the
general law, the court shall enter a dismissal order containing:
(1) Findings showing that the court had jurisdiction of the cause and of the parties;
(2) Findings showing that the child was represented by counsel;
(3) Findings showing that the hearing was held in the presence of the child and [his or
her] the child's counsel; and
(4) Findings showing the reasons underlying the court's decision to transfer
jurisdiction.
8. A copy of the petition or motion to modify and order of the dismissal shall be sent
to the prosecuting attorney.
9. When a petition or motion to modify has been dismissed,thereby permitting a child
to be prosecuted under the general law, and the prosecution of the child results in a
conviction, the jurisdiction of the juvenile court over that child is forever terminated, except
as provided in subsection 10 of this section, for an act that would be a violation of a state law
or municipal ordinance.
10. If a petition or motion to modify has been dismissed,thereby permitting a child to
be prosecuted under the general law, and the child is found not guilty by a court of general
jurisdiction, the juvenile court shall have jurisdiction over any later offense committed by that
child which would be considered a misdemeanor or felony if committed by an adult, subject
to the certification provisions of this section.

HB 3413 5
100 11. If the court does not dismiss the petition or motion to modify to permit the child to
101 be prosecuted under the general law, it shall set a date for the hearing upon the petition as
102 provided in section 211.171.
211.072. 1. [A juvenile under eighteen years of age who has been certified to stand
trial as an adult for offenses pursuant to section 211.071,] If currently placed in a secure
juvenile detention facility, unless otherwise ordered by the juvenile court, a certified
juvenile shall remain in a secure juvenile detention facility pending finalization of the
judgment and completion of appeal, if any, of the judgment dismissing the juvenile petition to
allow for prosecution under the general law [unless otherwise ordered by the juvenile court].
Upon the judgment dismissing the petition to allow prosecution under the general [laws] law
becoming final and adult charges being filed, if the certified juvenile is currently in a secure
juvenile detention facility, the certified juvenile shall remain in such facility unless the
certified juvenile posts bond or the certified juvenile is transferred to an adult jail. If the
juvenile officer does not believe juvenile detention would be the appropriate placement or
would continue to serve as the appropriate placement, the juvenile officer may file a motion
in the adult criminal case requesting that the certified juvenile be transferred from a secure
juvenile detention facility to an adult jail. The court shall hear evidence relating to the
appropriateness of the certified juvenile remaining in a secure juvenile detention facility or
being transferred to an adult jail. At such hearing, the following individuals shall have the
right to be present and have the opportunity to present evidence and recommendations [at
such hearing]:
(1) The certified juvenile;
(2) The [juvenile's] parents of the certified juvenile;
(3) The certified juvenile's counsel;
(4) The prosecuting attorney;
(5) The juvenile officer [or his or her designee] for the circuit in which the juvenile
was certified, or the juvenile officer's designee;
(6) The juvenile officer [or his or her designee] for the circuit in which the [pretrial-
certified] certified juvenile is proposed to be held, if different from the circuit in which the
juvenile was certified, or the juvenile officer's designee;
(7) Counsel for the juvenile officer; and
(8) Representatives of the county proposed to have custody of the [pretrial-certified]
certified juvenile.
2. Following the hearing, the court shall order that the certified juvenile continue to
be held in a secure juvenile detention facility subject to all Missouri juvenile detention
standards, or the court shall order that the [pretrial-certified] certified juvenile be held in an
adult jail, but only after the court has made findings that it would be in the best interest of

HB 3413 6
justice to move the [pretrial-certified] certified juvenile to an adult jail. The court shall
weigh the following factors when deciding whether to detain a certified juvenile in an adult
facility:
(1) The certified juvenile's age;
(2) The certified juvenile's physical and mental maturity;
(3) The certified juvenile's present mental state, including whether [he or she] the
certified juvenile presents an imminent risk of self-harm;
(4) The nature and circumstances of the charges;
(5) The certified juvenile's history of delinquency;
(6) The relative ability of the available adult and juvenile facilities to both meet the
needs of the certified juvenile and to protect the public and other [youth in their custody]
children or certified juveniles in the facilities;
(7) The opinion of the juvenile officer in the circuit of the proposed placement as to
the ability of that juvenile detention facility to provide for appropriate care, custody, and
control of the [pretrial-certified] certified juvenile pretrial; and
(8) Any other relevant factor.
3. In the event the court finds that it is in the best interest of justice to require the
certified juvenile to be held in an adult jail, the court shall hold a hearing once every thirty
days to determine whether the placement of the certified juvenile in an adult jail is still in the
best [interests] interestof justice. If a [pretrial-certified juvenile under eighteen years of age]
certified juvenile is ordered released on the certified juvenile's adult criminal case from an
adult jail following a transfer order under subsection 2 of this section and the certified
juvenile is detained on violation of the conditions of release or bond, the certified juvenile
shall return to the custody of the adult jail pending further court order.
4. A certified juvenile cannot be held in an adult jail for more than one hundred eighty
days unless the court finds, for good cause, that an extension is necessary or the juvenile,
through counsel, waives the one hundred eighty day maximum period. If no extension is
granted under this subsection, the certified juvenile shall be transferred from the adult jail to a
secure juvenile detention facility. If an extension is granted under this subsection, the court
shall hold a hearing once every thirty days to determine whether the placement of the certified
juvenile in an adult jail is still in the best interests of justice.
5. [Effective December 31, 2021, all previously pretrial-certified juveniles under
eighteen years of age who had been certified prior to August 28, 2021, shall be transferred
from adult jail to a secure juvenile detention facility, unless a hearing is held and the court
finds, based upon the factors in subsection 2 of this section, that it would be in the best
interest of justice to keep the juvenile in the adult jail.

HB 3413 7
6.] All [pretrial-certified juveniles under eighteen years of age] certified juveniles
who are held in adult jails pursuant to the best interest of justice exception shall continue to be
subject to the protections of the Prison Rape Elimination Act [(PREA)] of 2003, 42 U.S.C.
Section 15601 et seq., or any successor statute,and shall be physically separated from adult
inmates.
[7.] 6. If the certified juvenile remains in juvenile detention, the juvenile officer may
file a motion to reconsider placement. The court shall consider the factors set out in
subsection 2 of this section and the individuals set forth in subsection 1 of this section shall
have a right to be present and present evidence. The court may amend its earlier order in light
of the evidence and arguments presented at the hearing if the court finds that it would not be
in the best interest of justice for the juvenile to remain in a secure juvenile detention facility.
[8.] 7. Issues related to the setting of, and posting of, bond along with any bond
forfeiture proceedings shall be held in the [pretrial-certified] certified juvenile's adult
criminal case.
[9.] 8. Upon attaining eighteen years of age or upon a plea of guilty or conviction on
the adult charges, the certified juvenile shall be transferred from juvenile detention to the
appropriate adult facility.
[10.] 9. Any responsibility for transportation of and contracted service for the
certified juvenile who remains in a secure juvenile detention facility shall be handled by
county jail staff in the same manner as in all other adult criminal cases where the defendant is
in custody.
[11.] 10. The county jail staff shall designate a liaison assigned to each [pretrial-
certified] certified juvenile while housed in a juvenile detention facility, who shall assist in
communication with the juvenile detention facility on the needs of the certified juvenile
including, but not limited to, visitation, legal case status, medical and mental health needs,
and phone contact.
[12.] 11. The per diem provisions as set forth in section 211.156 shall apply to
certified juveniles who are being held in a secure juvenile detention facility.
12. The provisions of this section shall apply to juveniles who have been ordered
100 transferred to a court of general jurisdiction for prosecution under the general law
101 prior to January 1, 2028.
211.073. 1. [The court shall,] In a case when the offender is [under eighteen years of
age and has been transferred to a court of general jurisdiction pursuant to section 211.071,
and] a certified juvenile whose prosecution results in a conviction or a plea of guilty, the
court shall consider dual jurisdiction of both the criminal and juvenile codes, as set forth in
this section. The court is authorized to impose a juvenile disposition under this chapter and
simultaneously impose an adult criminal sentence, the execution of which shall be suspended

HB 3413 8
pursuant to the provisions of this section. Successful completion of the juvenile disposition
ordered shall be a condition of the suspended adult criminal sentence. The court may order an
offender into the custody of the division of youth services pursuant to this section:
(1) Upon agreement of the division of youth services; and
(2) If the division of youth services determines that there is space available in a
facility designed to serve offenders sentenced under this section.

If the division of youth services agrees to accept a [youth] certified juvenile and the court
does not impose a juvenile disposition, the court shall make findings on the record as to why
the division of youth services was not appropriate for the offender prior to imposing the adult
criminal sentence.
2. If there is probable cause to believe that the offender has violated a condition of the
suspended sentence or committed a new offense, the court shall conduct a hearing on the
violation charged, unless the offender waives such hearing. If the violation is established and
found the court may continue or revoke the juvenile disposition, impose the adult criminal
sentence, or enter such other order as it may see fit.
3. When an offender has received a suspended sentence pursuant to this section and
the division determines the [child] certified juvenile is beyond the scope of its treatment
programs, the division of youth services may petition the court for a transfer of custody of the
offender. The court shall hold a hearing and shall:
(1) Revoke the suspension and direct that the offender be taken into immediate
custody of the department of corrections; or
(2) Direct that the offender be placed on probation.
4. When an offender who has received a suspended sentence reaches the age of
eighteen, the court shall hold a hearing. The court shall:
(1) Revoke the suspension and direct that the offender be taken into immediate
custody of the department of corrections;
(2) Direct that the offender be placed on probation; or
(3) Direct that the offender remain in the custody of the division of youth services if
the division agrees to such placement.
5. The division of youth services shall petition the court for a hearing before it
releases an offender who comes within subsection 1 of this section at any time before the
offender reaches the age of twenty-one years. The court shall:
(1) Revoke the suspension and direct that the offender be taken into immediate
custody of the department of corrections; or
(2) Direct that the offender be placed on probation.

HB 3413 9
6. If the suspension of the adult criminal sentence is revoked, all time served by the
offender under the juvenile disposition shall be credited toward the adult criminal sentence
imposed.
211.075. 1. Beginning January 1, 2028, unless otherwise ordered by the juvenile
court, a certified juvenile shall be transferred to the division of youth services pending
finalization of the judgment and completion of appeal, if any, of the judgment dismissing
the juvenile petition to allow for prosecution under the general law. Upon the judgment
dismissing the petition to allow prosecution under the general law becoming final and
adult charges being filed, the certified juvenile shall remain in the custody of the
division of youth services unless the certified juvenile posts bond or the certified juvenile
is transferred to an adult jail. If the division of youth services does not believe
placement with the division of youth services would be appropriate or would continue to
be appropriate, the division may file a motion in the adult criminal case requesting that
the certified juvenile be transferred to an adult jail. The court shall hear evidence
relating to the appropriateness of the certified juvenile remaining with the division of
youth services or being transferred to an adult jail. At such hearing, the following
individuals shall have the right to be present and have the opportunity to present
evidence and recommendations:
(1) The certified juvenile;
(2) The parents of the certified juvenile;
(3) The certified juvenile's counsel;
(4) The prosecuting attorney; and
(5) The sheriff or another representative of the county jail proposed to have
custody of the certified juvenile.
2. Following the hearing, the court shall order that the certified juvenile
continue to be held by the division of youth services, or it shall order the certified
juvenile to be held in an adult jail, but only after the court has made findings that it
would be in the best interest of justice to move the certified juvenile to an adult jail. The
court shall weigh the following factors when deciding whether to detain a certified
juvenile in an adult facility:
(1) The age of the certified juvenile;
(2) The physical and mental maturity of the certified juvenile;
(3) The present mental state of the certified juvenile, including whether the
certified juvenile presents an imminent risk of self-harm;
(4) The nature and circumstances of the charges;
(5) The certified juvenile's history of delinquency;

HB 3413 10
(6) The relative ability of the available adult jail and the division of youth
services to protect the public and meet the needs of the certified juvenile and other
youth or certified juveniles in its custody; and
(7) Any other relevant factor.
3. In the event the court finds that it is in the best interest of justice to require the
certified juvenile to be held in an adult jail, the court shall hold a hearing once every
thirty days to determine whether the placement of the certified juvenile in an adult jail
is still in the best interest of justice. Following a transfer order under subsection 2 of
this section, if a certified juvenile is ordered released on the certified juvenile's adult
case from an adult jail and the certified juvenile is detained on violation of the
conditions of release or bond, the certified juvenile shall return to the custody of the
adult jail pending further court order.
4. A certified juvenile shall not be held in an adult jail for more than one
hundred eighty days unless:
(1) The court finds that an extension is necessary for good cause; or
(2) Through counsel, the certified juvenile waives the maximum period of one
hundred eighty days. If the court does not grant an extension under this subsection, the
certified juvenile shall be transferred from the adult jail to the division of youth services.
If the court grants an extension under this subsection, the court shall hold a hearing
once every thirty days to determine whether the placement of the certified juvenile in an
adult jail is still in the best interest of justice.
5. All certified juveniles who are held in adult jails under the best interest of
justice exception shall continue to be subject to the protections of the Prison Rape
Elimination Act of 2003, 42 U.S.C. Section 15601 et seq., or any successor statute, and
shall be physically separated from adult inmates.
6. If the certified juvenile remains with the division of youth services, the
division of youth services or the prosecuting attorney may file a motion to reconsider
placement. The court shall consider the factors set out in subsection 2 of this section,
and the individuals set forth in subsection 1 of this section shall have a right to be
present and present evidence. The court may amend its earlier order in light of the
evidence and arguments presented at the hearing if the court finds that it would not be
in the best interest of justice for the certified juvenile to remain with the division of
youth services.
7. Issues related to the setting and posting of bond, along with any bond
forfeiture proceedings, shall be held in the certified juvenile's adult criminal case.

HB 3413 11
8. Upon attaining eighteen years of age or upon a plea of guilty or conviction on
the adult charges, the certified juvenile shall be transferred to the appropriate adult
facility.
9. The county jail staff shall be responsible for transportation of a certified
juvenile from the division of youth services to all court appearances that require the
presence of the defendant. The division of youth services shall be responsible for
transportation of a certified juvenile for any other purpose.
10. The county jail staff shall designate a liaison assigned to each certified
juvenile while with the division of youth services, which liaison shall assist in
communication with the division of youth services, including, but not limited to,
visitation, legal case status, medical and mental health needs, and phone contact.
[211.069. Sections 211.071 and 211.073 shall be known and may be
cited as "Jonathan's Law".]
✔